Washington statutes.
RCW 16.38.060

Schedule of fees may be established—Use.

The director may, following a public hearing, establish a schedule of fees for services performed in carrying out such diagnostic service program. All fees collected under this provision shall be retained by the director of agriculture to be spent only for carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

[ 1986 c 203 s 6; 1969 c 100 s 6.]